Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-1309
Service award benefit program; authorized.

(1) After March 1, 2000, any city of the first class, city of the second
class, village, rural fire protection district, or suburban fire protection
district which relies in whole or in part upon a volunteer department for
emergency response services may adopt a service award benefit program as provided
in the Volunteer Emergency Responders Recruitment and Retention Act.

(2) No city, village, or fire protection district shall be required
to adopt a service award benefit program. Nothing in the act shall be construed
to mandate the creation of a service award benefit program in any city, village,
or fire protection district. The act shall not be construed to prohibit any
city, village, or fire protection district from ending or eliminating any
service award benefit program after its adoption, except that a city, village,
or fire protection district may not end its program or its responsibility
under its program with regard to any year of service completed prior to such
elimination.

(3) Each service award benefit program shall include provisions governing
the procedures to be followed in the tallying, recording, verifying, and auditing
of points earned by volunteers and provisions which provide for the collection
of such other information regarding participants as may be needed to facilitate administration
of the program.

Laws 1999, LB 849, § 9;

Laws 2001, LB 808, § 7;

Laws 2002, LB 1110, § 2;

Laws 2011, LB121, § 1.